test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ito_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - ito: # o-stems Morottaja
    ito+N+Sg+Nom: iˊto
    ito+N+Sg+Gen: iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Acc: iˊđo
    ito+N+Sg+Ill: iˊton
    ito+N+Sg+Loc: iiđoost
    ito+N+Sg+Com: iˊđoin
    ito+N+Sg+Abe: iˊđottáá
    ito+N+Ess: ittoon
    ito+N+Par: ittood
    ito+N+Pl+Nom: iˊđoh
    ito+N+Pl+Gen: iˊđoi
    ito+N+Pl+Acc: iˊđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Ill: iˊđoid
    ito+N+Pl+Loc: iiđoin
    ito+N+Pl+Com: iˊđoiguin
    ito+N+Pl+Abe: iˊđoittáá
